North Dakota statutes. CONSTITUTION OF NORTH DAKOTA
ARTICLE XVIII CONGRESSIONAL AND LEGISLATIVE APPORTIONMENT

Section 214.

Repealed by art. amd. 100, approved September 5, 1978 (S.L. 1977, ch. 607, § 1; 1979, ch. 691). (See § 54-03-01.5.) The section as originally adopted read:

Until otherwise provided by law, the member of the House of Representatives of the United States apportioned to this state shall be elected at large.

Until otherwise provided by law, the Senatorial and Representatives districts shall be formed, and the senators and representatives shall be apportioned as follows:

The First District shall consist of the townships of Walhalla, St. Joseph, Neche, Pembina, Bathgate, Carlisle, Joliet, Midland, Lincoln and Drayton, in the county of Pembina, and be entitled to one senator and two representatives.

The Second District shall consist of the townships of St. Thomas, Hamilton, Cavalier, Akra, Beauleau, Thingvalla, Gardar, Park, Crystal, Elora and Lodema, in the county of Pembina, and be entitled to one senator and two representatives.

The Third District shall consist of the townships of Perth, Latona, Adams, Silvesta, Cleveland, Morton, Vesta, Tiber, Medford, Vernon, Golden, Lampton, Eden, Rushford, Kensington, Dundee, Ops, Prairie Center, Fertile, Park River, and Glenwood, in the
county of Walsh, and be entitled to one senator and two representatives.

The Fourth District shall consist of the townships of Forest River, Walsh Center, Grafton, Farmington, Ardoch, village of Ardoch, Harrison, city of Grafton, Oakwood, Martin, Walshville, Pulaski, Acton, Minto and St. Andrews, in the county of Walsh, and
be entitled to one senator and three representatives.

The Fifth District shall consist of the townships of Gilby, Johnstown, Straban, Wheatfield, Hegton, Arvilla, Avon, Northwood, Lind, Grace, Larimore, and the city of Larimore, Elm Grove, Agnes, Inkster, Elkmount, Oakwood, Niagara, Moraine, Logan and Loretta,
in the county of Grand Forks, and be entitled to one senator and two representatives.

The Sixth District shall consist of the Third, Fourth, Fifth and Sixth wards of the city of Grand Forks, as now constituted, and the townships of Falconer, Harvey, Turtle River, Ferry, Rye, Blooming, Meckinock, Lakeville and Levant, in the county of Grand
Forks, and be entitled to one senator and two representatives.

The Seventh District shall consist of the First and Second wards of the city of Grand Forks, as now constituted, and the townships of Grand Forks, Brenna, Oakville, Chester, Pleasant View, Fairfield, Allendale, Walle, Bentru, Americus, Michigan, Union
and Washington, in the county of Grand Forks, and be entitled to one senator and two representatives.

The Eighth District shall consist of the county of Traill and be entitled to one senator and four representatives.

The Ninth District shall consist of the township of Fargo and the city of Fargo, in the county of Cass, and the fractional township number one hundred thirty-nine in range forty-eight, and be entitled to one senator and two representatives.

The Tenth District shall consist of the townships of Noble, Wiser, Harwood, Reed, Barnes, Stanley, Pleasant, Kenyon, Gardner, Berlin, Raymond, Mapleton, Warren, Norman, Elm River, Harmony, Durbin, Addison, Davenport, Casselton and the city of Casselton,
in the county of Cass, and be entitled to one senator and three representatives.

The Eleventh District shall consist of the townships of Webster, Rush River, Hunter, Arthur, Amenia, Everest, Maple River, Leonard, Dows, Erie, Empire, Wheatland, Gill, Walburg, Watson, Page, Rich, Ayr, Buffalo, Howes, Eldred, Highland, Rochester, Lake,
Cornell, Power, Hill, Clifton and Pontiac, in the county of Cass, and be entitled to one senator and three representatives.

The Twelfth District shall consist of the county of Richland and be entitled to one senator and three representatives.

The Thirteenth District shall consist of the county of Sargent and be entitled to one senator and two representatives.

The Fourteenth District shall consist of the county of Ransom and be entitled to one senator and two representatives.

The Fifteenth District shall consist of the county of Barnes and be entitled to one senator and two representatives.

The Sixteenth District shall consist of the counties of Steele and Griggs and be entitled to one senator and two representatives.

The Seventeenth District shall consist of the county of Nelson and be entitled to one senator and one representative.

The Eighteenth District shall consist of the county of Cavalier and be entitled to one senator and two representatives.

The Nineteenth District shall consist of the counties of Towner and Rolette and be entitled to one senator and one representative.

The Twentieth District shall consist of the counties of Benson and Pierce and be entitled to one senator and two representatives.

The Twenty-first District shall consist of the county of Ramsey and be entitled to one senator and two representatives.

The Twenty-second District shall consist of the counties of Eddy, Foster and Wells and be entitled to one senator and two representatives.

The Twenty-third District shall consist of the county of Stutsman and be entitled to one senator and two representatives.

The Twenty-fourth District shall consist of the county of LaMoure and be entitled to one senator and one representative.

The Twenty-fifth District shall consist of the county of Dickey and be entitled to one senator and two representatives.

The Twenty-sixth District shall consist of the counties of Emmons, McIntosh, Logan and Kidder, and be entitled to one senator and two representatives.

The Twenty-seventh District shall consist of the county of Burleigh and be entitled to one senator and two representatives.

The Twenty-eighth District shall consist of the counties of Bottineau and McHenry, and be entitled to one senator and one representative.

The Twenty-ninth District shall consist of the counties of Ward, and McLean, and all the unorganized counties lying north of the Missouri river, and be entitled to one senator and one representative.

The Thirtieth District shall consist of the counties of Morton and Oliver, and be entitled to one senator and two representatives.

The Thirty-first District shall consist of the counties of Mercer, Stark and Billings and all the unorganized counties lying south of the Missouri river, and be entitled to one senator and one representative.